Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Operation of Vehicles Generally
§ 31-5-215.
Limitations on turning around.

The driver of a vehicle shall not turn the vehicle so as to proceed in the opposite direction unless the movement can be made in safety and without interfering with other traffic.

No vehicle shall be turned so as to proceed in the opposite direction upon any curve, or upon the approach to or near the crest of a grade, where the vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction within five hundred (500) feet.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 57; C.S. 1945, § 60-657; W.S. 1957, § 31-113; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Automobiles: liability for u-turn collisions, 53 ALR4th 849.

§ 31-5-216.
Starting parked vehicle.

No person shall start a vehicle which is stopped, standing or parked unless and until the movement can be made with reasonable safety.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 58; C.S. 1945, § 60-658; W.S. 1957, § 31-114; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-217.
Turning movements and required signals.

No person shall turn a vehicle or move right or left upon a roadway unless and until the movement can be made with reasonable safety nor without giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided by this section.

A signal of intention to turn right or left when required shall be given continuously during not less than the last one hundred (100) feet traveled by the vehicle before turning.

No person shall stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal required by this act to the driver of any vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give the signal.

The signals required on vehicles by W.S. 31-5-218(b) shall not be flashed on one (1) side only on a disabled vehicle, flashed as a courtesy or “do pass” signal to operators of other vehicles approaching from the rear, nor be flashed on one (1) side only of a parked vehicle except as may be necessary for compliance with this section.

No person shall drive a motor vehicle upon private or public property to gain access to another roadway for the purpose of avoiding a traffic-control device.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 59; C.S. 1945, § 60-659; W.S. 1957, § 31-115; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Probable cause for traffic stop. —

Probable cause existed for the traffic stop of defendant because a police officer stopped defendant after observing defendant's vehicle turn without signaling in violation of Wyoming law. Vogt v. State ex rel. DOT, 2013 WY 123, 310 P.3d 899,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2013).

References to change of course construed with references to intersection, road or driveway. —

While this section prohibits the turning of a vehicle from a direct course and moving right or left until such movement can be made with reasonable safety, such a prohibition must be construed with and in the light of the specific references to an intersection, private road or driveway, and also with and in the light of §

31-5-209

having to do with lanes of traffic. Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961) (decided prior to 1984 revision of this title).

Meandering by bicycle rider within right-hand lane not violation as matter of law. —

It cannot be said as a matter of law that a turn in the nature of a meandering within a single right-hand lane of traffic by a child on a bicycle is a violation of this section. Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961).

Applied

in

Lake v. D & L Langley Trucking, Inc., 2010 WY 75, 233 P.3d 589,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(June 9, 2010).

Cited

in

State v. Welch, 873 P.2d 601,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sudden stop or slowing of motor vehicle as negligence, 29 ALR2d 5.

Violation of statutes by motorist's failure to give signal for right turn, 38 ALR2d 143.

Violation of statute by motorist's failure to give signal for left turn, 39 ALR2d 15.

What is a street or highway intersection within traffic rules, 7 ALR3d 1204.

Duty and liability with respect to giving audible signal at intersection, 21 ALR3d 268.

Negligence or contributory negligence of motorist in failing to proceed in accordance with turn signal given, 84 ALR4th 124.

Motorist's liability for signaling other vehicle or pedestrian to proceed, or to pass signaling vehicle, 14 ALR5th 193.

§ 31-5-218.
Signals by hand and arm or signal lamps.

Any stop or turn signal when required under this act shall be given either by means of the hand and arm or by signal lamps, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Any motor vehicle in use on a highway shall be equipped with, and required signal shall be given by, signal lamps when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the left outside limit of the body, cab or load of the motor vehicle exceeds twenty-four (24) inches, or when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the rear limit of the body or load thereof exceeds fourteen (14) feet. The latter measurement shall apply to any single vehicle and to any combination of vehicles.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 60; C.S. 1945, § 60-660; W.S. 1957, § 31-116; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Motorist's liability for signaling other vehicle or pedestrian to proceed, or to pass signaling vehicle, 14 ALR5th 193.

§ 31-5-219.
Manner of giving hand and arm signals.

All signals required under this act given by hand and arm shall be given from the left side of the vehicle in the following manner and the signals shall indicate as follows:

Left turn: Hand and arm extended horizontally;

Right turn: Hand and arm extended upward;

Stop or decrease speed: Hand and arm extended downward.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 61; C.S. 1945, § 60-661; W.S. 1957, § 31-117; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-220.
Approaching or entering intersection.

The driver of a vehicle approaching an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to a vehicle which has entered the intersection from a different highway.

When two (2) vehicles enter an intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right.

The right-of-way rules declared in subsections (a) and (b) of this section are modified at through highways and otherwise as stated in this act.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 62; C.S. 1945, § 60-662; W.S. 1957, § 31-118; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to designation of through highways, see §

31-5-503

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Driver on through street entitled to assume way clear. —

Where there is a through street, the vehicle driver thereon has a right to assume the way is clear for his passage through intersections, whereas the driver of a vehicle on the nonthrough intersecting street is subjected to a new and added peril when entering the intersection unless given warning of the superior right of the driver upon the through street in the use of the intersection. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

And driver approaching through street must stop before enteringintersection. —

Drivers of vehicles upon streets which intersect through streets are governed by §

31-5-503

, which requires a driver approaching a through street, indicated by a stop sign, to stop his vehicle before entering the intersection. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

But where there is no through street, both drivers must exercise same care.

Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

And governed by this section and §

31-5-221

. —

In the absence of there being a through or arterial street, drivers of vehicles on both of two intersecting streets are governed by this section and §

31-5-221

, which only require such drivers: (1) to yield the right-of-way to a vehicle which has entered the intersection from a different highway; and (2) when two vehicles enter the intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, to yield to the vehicle on the right. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966).

Right-of-way does not excuse failure to use due care. —

A motorist's failure to drive with due care is not excused on the ground that he has the statutory right-of-way. Pierce v. Bean, 57 Wyo. 189, 115 P.2d 660,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1941).

And to avoid collision. —

Rights of persons on streets are relative, and though this section, when conditions are equal, imposes duty upon driver approaching intersection to give right-of-way to vehicles approaching intersection on his right, it remains duty of driver given the right-of-way to exercise reasonable care to avoid collision with other vehicles. Garner v. Brown, 31 Wyo. 77, 223 P. 217,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1924).

Rights of persons on streets are relative, and though one is given right-of-way by this section, providing that one approaching intersection from right shall have right-of-way, it remains his duty to exercise reasonable care to avoid collision with other vehicles. Christensen v. McCann, 41 Wyo. 101, 282 P. 1061,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1929).

Applied

in

Fitzsimonds v. Cogswell, 405 P.2d 785,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1965).

Quoted

in

Parish v. Hammel, 445 P.2d 7,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1968); Oroz v. Hayes, 598 P.2d 432,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for automobile accident as affected by reliance upon or disregard of stop-and-go signal, 2 ALR3d 12.

Liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of stop-and-go signal, 2 ALR3d 155.

Liability for automobile accident at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of unchanging stop signal or sign, 3 ALR3d 180.

Liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of traffic sign or signal other than stop-and-go signal, 3 ALR3d 557.

§ 31-5-221.
Turning left at intersection.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn to the left shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close thereto as to constitute an immediate hazard.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 63; C.S. 1945, § 60-663; W.S. 1957, § 31-119; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Statutory duties imposed upon drivers with respect to left-hand turn at intersection

are contained in § 31-5-214(a)(ii) and this section. Berta v. Ford, 469 P.2d 12,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1970).

Duty upon left-turning motorist and approaching motorist is mutual obligation, equally imposed.

Hack v. Pickrell, 515 P.2d 134,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1973).

“Proper lookout”

includes a duty to see objects in plain sight and a driver is bound to see reasonably that which is open and apparent and he must take knowledge of obvious dangers. This duty is not merely one of looking but one of observing, which imposes upon an operator the necessity of being observant as to the traffic and general situation. Berta v. Ford, 469 P.2d 12,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1970).

Justification for turning left depends on circumstances. —

It is quite clear under the provisions of this section that whether or not a driver of an automobile is justified in turning to the left at a particular time depends on the circumstances. Frazier v. Pokorny, 349 P.2d 324,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1960).

Whether or not under this section a driver of a vehicle is justified in turning to the left at a particular time depends on the circumstances. Berta v. Ford, 469 P.2d 12,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1970).

Driver with right-of-way not relieved from liability for ownnegligence. —

If the driver with the right-of-way has a right to believe that the driver making the turn will stop before entering his lane of traffic, still that does not relieve him from liability if he contributes to the collision. Frazier v. Pokorny, 349 P.2d 324,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1960).

Applied

in

Parish v. Hammel, 445 P.2d 7,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1968).

Cited

in

Fanning v. City of Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

§ 31-5-222.
Stop signs and yield signs.

Preferential right-of-way may be indicated by stop signs or yield signs as authorized in W.S.

31-5-503

.

Except when directed to proceed by a police officer, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After having stopped the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when the driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways. The driver shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians within an adjacent crosswalk.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign shall in obedience to the sign slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and, if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time the driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways. The driver shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians within an adjacent crosswalk. If the driver is involved in a collision with a pedestrian in a crosswalk or a vehicle in the intersection or junction of roadways, after driving past a yield sign without stopping, the collision shall be deemed prima facie evidence of his failure to yield the right-of-way.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 64; C.S. 1945, § 60-664; W.S. 1957, § 31-120; Laws 1959, ch. 65, § 1; 1963, ch. 52, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “immediate hazard.” —

The term “immediate hazard,” as used in subsection (b), means that a vehicle on a through highway approaching an intersection constitutes an immediate hazard when it is not so far distant from the intersection that considering the rate of speed at which it is traveling it would be reasonable to assume that a collision would occur if the vehicle stopped at the intersection on the stop street were to start in motion and move into the path of the vehicle on the through street. Colwell v. Anderson, 438 P.2d 448,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1968).

Presumption. —

In a husband and wife's tort suit against a truck driver and her employer for severe injuries the husband sustained in a motor vehicle accident, the district court did not err in refusing to instruct the jury concerning a statutory presumption under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-222(c) as the employer did not argue at trial, or offer an instruction stating, that the statute created a presumption that shifted the burden of proof, as required by Wyo. R. Civ. P. 51(b), and the question of fault was a factual one for the jury to decide.
Werner Enters. v. Brophy, 2009 WY 132, 218 P.3d 948,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Rogers v. Hansen, 361 P.2d 676,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1961); Robinson v. Shoumaker, 418 P.2d 789,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1966).

Quoted

in

Husted v. French Creek Ranch, Inc., 79 Wyo. 307, 333 P.2d 948,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1959).

Yield the right-of-way. —

District court properly, on the jury verdict, found a driver not negligent in causing an automobile accident because, notwithstanding evidence that the driver failed to yield the right of way to the second driver, the jury could reasonably conclude from the evidence that the first driver acted as an ordinary careful person would under the same or similar circumstances where the conflicting trial testimony permitted the jury to draw more than one reasonable inference, the evidence showed that the first driver carefully approached the “T” intersection, took extra time to twice look left and right, proceeded slowly when he thought it was safe, and only collided with the second driver when the second driver cut sharply into his lane of travel. Wageman v. Harrell, 2020 WY 143, 476 P.3d 657,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 31-5-223.
Entering or crossing roadway.

The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a roadway from any place other than another roadway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on the roadway to be entered or crossed.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 65; C.S. 1945, § 60-665; W.S. 1957, § 31-121; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

When approaching vehicle within section. —

Any vehicle approaching at a speed and within a distance which would have warned a reasonable person that its travel could be endangered or interfered with by the entrance of another vehicle upon the highway would be a circumstance directly related to the violation of this section. MacManus v. Getter Trucking Co., 384 P.2d 974,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1963).

Vehicle being struck before completing entrance tends to showfailure to yield. —

The fact that a vehicle is struck before it has completed an entrance to the highway constitutes evidence tending to show that it has failed to yield the right-of-way. MacManus v. Getter Trucking Co., 384 P.2d 974,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1963).

§ 31-5-224.
Operation of vehicles upon approach of authorized emergency vehicles and other parked or slow-moving vehicles.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle making use of audible or visual signals meeting the requirements of W.S.

31-5-928

and

31-5-952

, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway clear of any intersection and shall stop and remain in that position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer. When an authorized emergency vehicle making use of any visual signals provided for in W.S.

31-5-928

(d) is parked, the driver of every other vehicle, as soon as it is safe:

When driving on an interstate highway or other highway with two (2) or more lanes traveling in the direction of the emergency vehicle, shall merge into the lane farthest from the emergency vehicle or at least one (1) lane of traffic apart from the emergency vehicle, except when otherwise directed by a police officer;

When driving on a two (2) lane road with a posted speed limit of forty-five (45) miles per hour or greater, shall slow to a speed that is twenty (20) miles per hour less than the posted speed limit, except when otherwise directed by a police officer.

When an authorized municipal, public utility or highway construction or maintenance vehicle is stopped or is moving at less than twenty (20) miles per hour on or within three (3) feet of a roadway and is making use of any visual signals provided for in W.S. 31-5-928(d), (f)(ii), (h) or

31-5-930

, the driver of every other vehicle, as soon as it is safe:

When driving on an interstate highway or other highway with two (2) or more lanes traveling in the same direction of the municipal, public utility or highway construction or maintenance vehicle, shall merge into the lane farthest from the vehicle or at least one (1) lane of traffic apart from the vehicle except when otherwise directed by a police officer;

When driving on a two (2) lane road with a posted speed limit of forty-five (45) miles per hour or greater, shall slow to a speed that is twenty (20) miles per hour less than the posted speed limit, except when otherwise directed by a police officer.

This section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, municipal, public utility or highway construction or maintenance vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.

For purposes of this section, “public utility” means as defined in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 66; C.S. 1945, § 60-666; W.S. 1957, § 31-122; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2001, ch. 83, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2018 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(i), inserted “from the emergency vehicle or at least one (1) lane of traffic apart”; in (a)(ii), inserted “with a posted speed limit of forty-five (45) miles per hour or greater”; added (b); redesignated former (b) as (c); in (c), inserted “municipal, public utility or highway construction or maintenance vehicle”; and added (d).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added ", (h)" following "(f)(ii)" in (b).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Use or nonuse of flashing light, siren or other alarm device as affecting liability arising from accident involving police vehicle, 83 ALR2d 383.

Liability for personal injury or damage at street intersection from operation of ambulance, 84 ALR2d 121.

Construction and application of statutory provision requiring motorists to yield right-of-way to emergency vehicle, 87 ALR5th 1.

§ 31-5-225.
Fleeing or attempting to elude police officers; penalty.

Any driver of a motor vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to bring his vehicle to a stop, or who otherwise flees or attempts to elude a pursuing police vehicle, when given visual or audible signal to bring the vehicle to a stop, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The signal given by the police officer may be by hand, voice, emergency light or siren. The officer giving the signal shall be in uniform, prominently displaying his badge of office, and his vehicle shall be appropriately marked showing it to be an official police vehicle.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, every person convicted of fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

A driver commits aggravated fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer if:

The driver has previously been convicted of fleeing or eluding a police officer under either subsection (a) of this section or this subsection; or

In the course of committing a violation under subsection (a) of this section the driver:

Attempts to cause or intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to any other person; or

Causes property damage to the property of any other person in an amount exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00).

Every person convicted of aggravated fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 194, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-122.1; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 135, § 1; 2019 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to running manned roadblock, see §

6-5-205

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b) substituted “six (6) months” for “ninety (90) days.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), added “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section,” at the beginning; and added (c) and (d).

Resentencing.—

Remand for resentencing was appropriate because defendant’s sentence for fleeing or attempting to elude police officers was illegal as it exceeded the statutory maximum term of six months for that offense. Nesius v. State, 2019 WY 129, 454 P.3d 927,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2019).

Cited

in

McChesney v. State, 988 P.2d 1071,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1999); Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Aug. 1, 2008); Leyva v. State, 2009 WY 149, 220 P.3d 791,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Dec. 9, 2009); Leyva v. State, 2009 WY 149, 220 P.3d 791,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Dec. 9, 2009).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of one fleeing police for injury resulting from collision of police vehicle with another vehicle, person or object, 51 ALR3d 1226.

What constitutes “fleeing from justice” within meaning of 18 U.S.C. § 3290 which provides that no statute of limitations shall extend to persons fleeing from justice, 148 ALR Fed 573.

§ 31-5-226.
Limitations on backing.

The driver of a vehicle shall not back the vehicle unless the movement can be made with safety and without interfering with other traffic.

The driver of a vehicle shall not back the vehicle upon any shoulder or roadway of any controlled-access highway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 94; C.S. 1945, § 60-694; W.S. 1957, § 31-123; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury occasioned by backing of motor vehicle in public street or highway, 63 ALR2d 5.

§ 31-5-227.
Driving through defiles or canyons or on mountain highways.

The driver of a motor vehicle traveling through defiles or canyons or on mountain highways shall hold the motor vehicle under control and as near the right-hand edge of the highway as reasonably possible and, except when driving entirely to the right of the center of the roadway, shall give audible warning with the horn of the motor vehicle upon approaching any curve where the view is obstructed within a distance of two hundred (200) feet along the highway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 97; C.S. 1945, § 60-697; W.S. 1957, § 31-124; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cited

in

Hodges v. State, 904 P.2d 334,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 31-5-228.
Loads on vehicles.

No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any highway unless the vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of its load from dropping, sifting, leaking or otherwise escaping therefrom. This section does not prohibit the necessary spreading of any substance in highway maintenance or construction operations.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 89, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-124.1; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-229.
Reckless driving.

Any person who drives any vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 35; C.S. 1945, § 60-635; W.S. 1957, § 31-125; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to suspension or revocation of driver's license or privilege of driving upon conviction of reckless driving, see §§

31-7-127

and

31-7-128

.

Reckless driving is condemned by this section even though no actual injury

to persons or property may result. Norfolk v. State, 360 P.2d 605,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1961).

What constitutes reckless driving depends upon the particular circumstances,

and the determination is for the trier of fact, whether it be the judge or a jury. Norfolk v. State, 360 P.2d 605,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1961).

“Willful misconduct.” —

“Willful misconduct” implies at least the intentional doing of something either with a knowledge that serious injury is a probable (as distinguished from a possible) result, or the intentional doing of an act with a wanton and reckless disregard of its possible result. State v. Rideout, 450 P.2d 452,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1969).

Exceeding speed limit does not necessarily constitute reckless driving. —

It is not necessarily true that exceeding the speed limit will constitute reckless driving within the meaning of this section, since there might be an emergency or, if a driver wants to pass another car which is being driven slowly, it may be necessary to exceed the speed limit for a short time in order not to endanger passengers in the car which is being passed. Norfolk v. State, 360 P.2d 605,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1961).

Under this section, speed alone does not necessarily suffice to show reckless disregard for the safety of others. Bartlett v. State, 569 P.2d 1235,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1977), overruled, Nowack v. State, 774 P.2d 561,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1989).

No speedy trial violation. —

Where a defendant appealed his conviction for reckless driving, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-5-229

, the 332 days he spent incarcerated between his arrest and the commencement of his trial did not constitute a violation of his Sixth Amendment right to a speedy trial. The State's decision to file a new information against him could not be characterized as an eleventh-hour decision; the delay was akin to the delays in the Wehr and Boucher decisions. Mascarenas v. State, 2013 WY 163, 315 P.3d 656,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence sufficient for conviction. —

Where a defendant appealed his conviction for reckless driving, in violation of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-5-229

, he unsuccessfully argued that the State failed to present sufficient evidence to sustain his conviction for reckless driving because it only presented evidence that he was driving while under the influence and crashed his vehicle into a tree. The testimony was sufficient for a jury to make a reasonable inference that squealing tires, driving over curbs and into yards, and crashing into trees would likely only occur because the driver was driving in a way that disregarded the safety of other people or property.
Mascarenas v. State, 2013 WY 163, 315 P.3d 656,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence sufficient for conviction. —

See Wood v. Casper, 683 P.2d 1147,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1984).

No mandated reduction of tort damages if misconduct willful and wanton. —

Section

1-1-109

does not mandate the reduction of damages on the basis of comparative negligence of the plaintiff if the defendant's misconduct is willful and wanton. Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Wyoming Intermediate Appeals. Wood v. City of Casper, 660 P.2d 1163,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Driving while intoxicated as reckless driving where driving while intoxicated is made a separate offense, 52 ALR2d 1337.

What amounts to reckless driving of motor vehicle within statute making such a criminal offense, 52 ALR2d 1337.

Liability as between participants for action arising from private automobiles or other vehicles racing on public street or highway, 59 ALR2d 481.

Speed alone or in connection with other circumstances as gross negligence, wantonness, recklessness or the like under automobile guest statute, 6 ALR3d 769.

Liability of participant in unauthorized highway race for injury to third person directly caused by other racer, 13 ALR3d 431.

Liability for negligent operation of dune buggy, 2 ALR4th 795.

Statute prohibiting reckless driving: definiteness and certainty, 52 ALR4th 1161.

§ 31-5-230.
Coasting.

The driver of any motor vehicle when traveling upon a downgrade shall not coast with the gears or transmission of the vehicle in neutral.

The driver of a truck or bus when traveling upon a downgrade shall not coast with the clutch disengaged.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 98; C.S. 1945, § 60-698; W.S. 1957, § 31-126; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-231.
Following fire apparatus.

The driver of any vehicle other than one on official business shall not follow any fire apparatus traveling in response to a fire alarm closer than five hundred (500) feet or stop the vehicle within five hundred (500) feet of any fire apparatus stopped in answer to a fire alarm.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 99; C.S. 1945, § 60-699; W.S. 1957, § 31-127; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-232.
Driving over fire hose.

No vehicle shall be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department when laid down on any street, private road or driveway to be used at any fire or alarm of fire, without the consent of the fire department official in command.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 100; C.S. 1945, § 60-700; W.S. 1957, § 31-128; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.